Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201368-1802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection
Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) Intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disabilities has
the definition found in section 71-421;

(3) Medical assistance program means the program established
pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act; and

(4) Net revenue means the revenue paid to an intermediate
care facility for persons
with developmental disabilities for resident care, room, board,
and services less contractual adjustments and does not include revenue from
sources other than operations, including, but not limited to, interest and
guest meals.

Laws 2004, LB 841, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 72;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 292;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 17.
September 6, 2013
Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.